Maryland, session 2025, SB0651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–208.
(c) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF TENANT
AND LANDLORD AFFAIRS IN THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT.
(2) A lease shall include:
[(1)] (I) A statement that the premises will be made available in a
condition permitting habitation, with reasonable safety, if that is the agreement, or if that
is not the agreement, a statement of the agreement concerning the condition of the
premises;
[(2)] (II) The landlord’s and the tenant’s specific obligations as to heat,
gas, electricity, water, and repair of the premises;
[(3)] (III) A receipt for the security deposit as specified in § 8–203.1 of this
subtitle; and
[(4)] (IV) A copy of the most current version of the Maryland Tenants’ Bill
of Rights published by the Office [of Tenant and Landlord Affairs in the Department of
Housing and Community Development].
(3) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN A COUNTY THAT HAS
ADOPTED A LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–402.3 OF THIS
TITLE.
(II) A LEASE OR LEASE RENEWAL SHALL INCLUDE NOTICE
STATING WHETHER THE LANDLORD IS SUBJECT TO THE LOCAL GOOD CAUSE
STATUTE OR ORDINANCE OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH A RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNIT IS
LOCATED.
(III) A LANDLORD STATING IN A NOTICE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THAT THE LOCAL GOOD CAUSE PROVISIONS OF THE

SENATE BILL 651 3
COUNTY DO NOT APPLY TO THE LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE THE TENANT WITH THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION ON A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE OFFICE:
1. THE FULL LEGAL NAME OF EACH INDIVIDUAL AND
THE BUSINESS NAME OF EACH ENTITY WITH DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP OR
MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN THE RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNIT;
2. THE NUMBER OF RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS IN THE
STATE OWNED BY EACH INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, INCLUDING THE ADDRESS OF EACH RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNIT
IDENTIFIED; AND
3. ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
OFFICE.
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY HAS AN INTEREST IN A
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNIT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF
THE INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY HAS A DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP OR
MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN ANY ENTITY THAT HAS A DIRECT OR INDIRECT
OWNERSHIP OR MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN THE RENTAL UNIT.
(V) IF A LANDLORD BECOMES SUBJECT TO A LOCAL GOOD
CAUSE LAW OR ORDINANCE, THE LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE TIMELY WRITTEN
NOTICE TO ALL TENANTS OF THE LANDLORD IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE GOOD
CAUSE REQUIREMENTS APPLY, INCLUDING ANY TENANT HOLDING OVER UNDER §
8–402 OF THIS TITLE.
(VI) 1. THE OFFICE SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE A DISCLOSURE FORM FOR USE BY A LANDLORD UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
2. THE OFFICE MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS PARAGRAPH.
8–402.
(c) (1) This subsection applies to all cases of tenancies at the expiration of a
stated term, tenancies from year to year, tenancies from month to month, and tenancies
from week to week.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, AND
SUBJECT TO ANY LOCAL REQUIREMENT ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–402.3
OF THIS SUBTITLE, a landlord shall provide written notice of the intent to terminate a
tenancy:

SENATE BILL 651
(i) If the parties have a written lease for a stated term in excess of
1 week or a tenancy from month to month, 60 days before the expiration of the tenancy;
(ii) In the case of tenancies from year to year, including tobacco farm
tenancies from year to year but excluding all other farm tenancies from year to year, 90
days before the expiration of the current year of the tenancy;
(iii) In the case of tenancies from year to year for all other farm
tenancies, 180 days before the expiration of the current year of the tenancy; and
(iv) In the case of tenancies from week to week:
1. If the parties have a written lease, 7 days before the
expiration of the tenancy; or
2. If the parties do not have a written lease, 21 days before
the expiration of the tenancy.
(d) Unless stated otherwise in the written lease and initialed by the tenant, when
a landlord consents to a holdover tenant remaining on the premises, the holdover tenant
becomes a periodic week–to–week tenant if the tenant was a week–to–week tenant before
the tenant’s holding over, and a periodic month–to–month tenant in all other cases.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF TENANT
AND LANDLORD AFFAIRS IN THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IN A COUNTY THAT HAS
ADOPTED A LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–402.3 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) PRIOR TO, OR CONTEMPORANEOUSLY WITH, NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A LANDLORD SHALL USE THE
FORM DEVELOPED BY THE OFFICE TO PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE BY FIRST–CLASS
MAIL WITH A CERTIFICATE OF MAILING TO A TENANT STATING:
1. THE GOOD CAUSE FOR THE NONRENEWAL OF THE
LEASE OR THE TERMINATION OF THE HOLDOVER TENANCY; OR
2. THAT THE LANDLORD IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE LOCAL
GOOD CAUSE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–402.3 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 651 5
(II) THE OFFICE SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE A FORM FOR THE NOTICE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(4) (I) A COMPLAINT FILED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL STATE
ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. THE GOOD CAUSE FOR THE NONRENEWAL OF THE
LEASE OR THE TERMINATION OF THE HOLDOVER TENANCY; OR
2. THAT THE LANDLORD IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE LOCAL
GOOD CAUSE REQUIREMENTS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–402.3 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(II) A LANDLORD SHALL PLEAD SPECIFIC FACTS IN THE
COMPLAINT TO PROVE THE STATEMENTS MADE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE.
(III) 1. IF A LANDLORD CLAIMS IN THE STATEMENT THAT THE
LANDLORD IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE LOCAL GOOD CAUSE REQUIREMENTS UNDER §
8–402.3(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE LANDLORD SHALL INCLUDE A CURRENT
DISCLOSURE FORM AS PROVIDED IN § 8–208(C)(3)(III) OF THIS TITLE WITH THE
COMPLAINT.
2. AN INDIVIDUAL THAT IS IDENTIFIED IN THE
DISCLOSURE FORM AS HAVING A DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN
THE RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNIT OF THE LANDLORD, OR THAT INDIVIDUAL’S
DESIGNEE, SHALL SUBMIT AN AFFIDAVIT WITH THE COMPLAINT THAT CERTIFIES
THE DISCLOSURE FORM IS TRUE AND COMPLETE.
3. IF A CURRENT DISCLOSURE FORM AND AFFIDAVIT
ARE NOT SUBMITTED WITH THE COMPLAINT, THE LANDLORD SHALL BE SUBJECT TO
THE LOCAL GOOD CAUSE REQUIREMENTS OF THE COUNTY FOR THAT ACTION.
8–402.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “HOLDOVER TENANCY” MEANS A TENANCY
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 8–402(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A COUNTY
MAY ADOPT, BY LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE, PROVISIONS THAT PROHIBIT A
LANDLORD FROM FAILING TO RENEW A LEASE DURING THE LEASE PERIOD OR
SEEKING TO TERMINATE A HOLDOVER TENANCY WITHOUT GOOD CAUSE.

SENATE BILL 651
(2) EACH OF THE FOLLOWING GROUNDS SHALL CONSTITUTE GOOD
CAUSE IN A LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) A TENANT COMMITTING A SUBSTANTIAL BREACH OF THE
LEASE OR CAUSING SUBSTANTIAL DAMAGE TO THE LEASED PREMISES OR ANOTHER
AREA OF THE PROPERTY AND, AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE TO CURE OR CORRECT THE
BREACH OR PAY THE REASONABLE COST OF REPAIRING THE DAMAGE, THE TENANT
FAILS TO COMPLY WITHIN 14 DAYS;
(II) A TENANT ENGAGING IN ROUTINE DISORDERLY CONDUCT
THAT DISTURBS THE PEACE AND QUIET OF OTHER TENANTS;
(III) A TENANT ENGAGING IN ILLEGAL ACTIVITY ON THE LEASED
PREMISES, ANOTHER AREA OF THE PROPERTY, OR A PUBLIC RIGHT–OF–WAY
ABUTTING THE LEASED PREMISES;
(IV) A TENANT, WITHOUT REASONABLE CAUSE, REFUSING TO
GRANT THE LANDLORD ACCESS TO THE LEASED PREMISES FOR THE PURPOSE OF
MAKING REPAIRS OR IMPROVEMENTS OR INSPECTING THE LEASED PREMISES, OR
AS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED UNDER THE RESIDENTIAL LEASE OR APPLICABLE LAW;
(V) A HOLDOVER TENANT FAILING TO ACCEPT A LANDLORD’S
OFFER OF A NEW LEASE AGREEMENT FOR A TERM OF AT LEAST 1 MONTH BUT NOT
LONGER THAN THE TERM OF THE LEASE AGREEMENT EFFECTIVE IMMEDIATELY
BEFORE THE HOLDOVER TENANCY WITHIN 1 MONTH AFTER THE LANDLORD MAKES
THE OFFER OR A GREATER PERIOD OF TIME AS OTHERWISE ESTABLISHED BY LAW;
(VI) A TENANT REPEATEDLY COMMITTING MINOR VIOLATIONS
OF THE LEASE THAT:
1. DISRUPT THE LIVABILITY OF THE LEASED PREMISES;
2. INTERFERE WITH THE MANAGEMENT OF THE
PROPERTY; OR
3. HAVE AN ADVERSE FINANCIAL IMPACT ON THE
PROPERTY;
(VII) A TENANT HABITUALLY FAILING TO PAY RENT WHEN DUE,
IF THE TENANT HAS BEEN NOTIFIED BY THE LANDLORD IN WRITING THAT THE RENT
IS MORE THAN 10 DAYS LATE AT LEAST FOUR TIMES IN A 12–MONTH PERIOD;

SENATE BILL 651 7
(VIII) A LANDLORD, IN GOOD FAITH, SEEKING TO RECOVER
POSSESSION OF THE LEASED PREMISES FOR USE BY THE LANDLORD OR THE
LANDLORD’S:
1. SPOUSE;
2. CHILD OR STEPCHILD;
3. PARENT OR STEPPARENT;
4. GRANDPARENT;
5. SIBLING;
6. MOTHER–IN–LAW OR FATHER–IN–LAW;
7. DAUGHTER–IN–LAW OR SON–IN–LAW;
8. GRANDCHILD; OR
9. AUNT OR UNCLE;
(IX) A LANDLORD, AFTER HAVING OBTAINED ALL NECESSARY
PERMITS, SEEKING TO UNDERTAKE SUBSTANTIAL REPAIRS OR RENOVATIONS THAT
CANNOT BE COMPLETED WHILE THE LEASED PREMISES ARE OCCUPIED; AND
(X) A LANDLORD, IN GOOD FAITH, SEEKING TO REMOVE THE
LEASED PREMISES FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR FROM THE RENTAL MARKET.
(3) A COUNTY MAY NOT ADOPT ADDITIONAL OR ALTERNATIVE
GROUNDS FOR GOOD CAUSE BY LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE.
(C) A LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE ADOPTED BY A COUNTY UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) SHALL:
(I) APPLY ONLY TO A LANDLORD THAT OWNS SIX OR MORE
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING ANY RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
UNITS THAT THE LANDLORD OWNS OR CONTROLS:
1. IN WHOLE OR IN PART;
2. DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY; OR

SENATE BILL 651
3. THROUGH ONE OR MORE LEGAL ENTITIES;
(II) REQUIRE THAT A LANDLORD ENFORCE SUBSTANTIAL
BREACHES OF A LEASE CONSISTENTLY AMONG ALL TENANTS; AND
(III) PROHIBIT A LANDLORD FROM ASSERTING GOOD CAUSE
BASED ON A SUBSTANTIAL BREACH OF A LEASE UNLESS THE LANDLORD ENFORCES
SUBSTANTIAL BREACHES OF A LEASE CONSISTENTLY AMONG ALL TENANTS; AND
(2) MAY NOT:
(I) APPLY TO AN OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
UNIT;
(II) REQUIRE A LANDLORD TO DEMONSTRATE GOOD CAUSE IF A
TENANT PROVIDES NOTICE TO THE LANDLORD THAT EXPRESSES THE TENANT’S
INTENT NOT TO RENEW THE LEASE OR CONTINUE WITH THE HOLDOVER TENANCY;
OR
(III) CONFLICT WITH THE NOTICE REQUIREMENTS OF § 8–402(C)
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
FOR PURPOSES OF ESTABLISHING THE NUMBER OF UNITS OWNED BY A LANDLORD
TO DETERMINE THE APPLICABILITY OF A LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE ADOPTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, ANY RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNIT IN THE STATE
OWNED BY AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT HAS DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP
OR MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN THE LANDLORD SHALL BE CONSIDERED A UNIT
OWNED BY THE LANDLORD.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY DOES NOT HAVE OWNERSHIP OR
MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN A LANDLORD IF THE INDIVIDUAL’S OR ENTITY’S
INTEREST IN THE LANDLORD IS IN THE NATURE OF A NONCONTROLLING INTEREST
IN A PUBLICLY TRADED CORPORATION, TRUST, MUTUAL FUND, OR SIMILAR
INVESTMENT VEHICLE.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, NOTHING IN
THIS SECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED TO ALTER THE RIGHTS OF A LANDLORD THAT
SEEKS RELIEF UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A LANDLORD IN A COUNTY THAT HAS ADOPTED A LOCAL LAW OR
ORDINANCE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY SEEK RELIEF UNDER § 8–402 OF THIS
SUBTITLE ONLY AFTER DECLINING TO ENTER INTO A NEW LEASE OR TO CONTINUE A

SENATE BILL 651 9
HOLDOVER TENANCY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE LOCAL LAW
OR ORDINANCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.